Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB587.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1702-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1702-A.1. Determination of eligibility and method of submission.* * *(a.1) Anti-union violations.--Except as otherwise provided by law, before a tax credit or tax benefit may be awarded, the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 department or administering agency, as applicable, shall make a finding that an applicant or a recipient has not committed an anti-union activity within the previous 10 years. If the department or administering agency determines that the applicant or recipient has committed an anti-union activity within the previous 10 years, the department or administering agency may not award a tax credit or tax benefit.* * *(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "anti-union activity" means any of the following:(1) A complaint issued under 29 U.S.C. § 160 (relating to prevention of unfair labor practices) against an applicant or recipient for an unfair labor practice under 29 U.S.C. § 158(a) (relating to unfair labor practices) , unless an order of the National Labor Relations Board related to the complaint is set aside in full in accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 160(d), (e) and (f) . (2) A settlement offer related to an investigation by the National Labor Relations Board of a charge of an unfair labor practice under 29 U.S.C. § 158(a) , which results in a settlement of the charge without issuance of a complaint under 29 U.S.C. § 160 . (3) A finding of interference, influence or coercion by a Federal court under 45 U.S.C. § 152 (relating to general duties) . (4) A violat ion of the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act.(5) A complaint of an unfair labor practice under the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act.(6) A violation of an order issued by the Pennsylvania 20250SB0587PN0594 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Labor Relations Board.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0587PN0594 - 3 - 12